Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 17
COLORADO HIGH TECHNOLOGY
SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM

23-17-101 to 23-17-106. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article repealed, (HB 10-1256), ch. 133, p. 440, § 1, effective August 11.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 2000. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2010, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.